Illinois, session 104th, HB3644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. False representation of motor fuel price. It 8is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act for any 9person to sell, offer to sell, or attempt to sell motor fuel if 10the price of the motor fuel is falsely represented to a 11consumer through advertising labels or signs that indicate a 12different price for the motor fuel than the price at the point 13of distribution. As used in this Section, "motor fuel" has the 14meaning given to that term in Section 1.1 of the Motor Fuel Tax 15Law.